California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) (1) The department may adopt emergency regulations to implement the provisions of this section in accordance with rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The initial adoption of emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and
 safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of those regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations.

(2) As an alternative to paragraph (1), and notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the department may implement and administer this section by means of provider bulletins, all-county letters, manuals, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall notify the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature of its intent to issue a provider
 bulletin, all-county letter, manual, or other similar instruction, at least five days prior to issuance. In addition, the department shall provide a copy of any provider bulletin, all-county letter, manual, or other similar instruction issued under this paragraph to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 29, Sec. 11.   (AB 102)   Effective June 29, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.281.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That because the implementation of Section 14105.28 is expected to require several years and further rate changes may make the transition to an inpatient hospital reimbursement methodology based on diagnosis-related groups more difficult, and because of the need to take
 into account the amount of base payments when combined with supplemental payments made to inpatient hospitals, including payments provided as a result of the hospital fee set forth in Article 5.22 (commencing with Section 14167.31) and Article 5.225 (commencing with Section 14167.41), it is necessary to impose the rate freeze enacted in this section.

(2) (A) Upon implementation of Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and Article 5.22 (commencing with Section 14167.31), as added by Assembly Bill 1383 of the 2009–10 Regular Session, supplemental payments shall be made to hospitals that have contracts negotiated pursuant to the Selective Provider Contracting Program, provided that rates under these contracts are not reduced below the contract rates in effect on the effective date of Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1), as added by Assembly Bill 1383 of the 2009–10 Regular Session.

(B) Assembly Bill 1383 of the 2009–10 Regular Session was signed into law on October 11, 2009, and the effective date of Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) was January 1, 2010. Therefore, in consideration of the notice provided by Assembly Bill 1383 of the 2009–10 Regular Session, and in further consideration that the negotiated contract rates in effect on January 1, 2010, or the rates in effect on July 1, 2010, to the extent those rates are lower than the rates in effect on January 1, 2010, as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), are sufficient to conform with the standards set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as well as the existence of supplemental payments to be made under Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1), the Legislature exercises its discretion, in consultation with the department, to freeze rates at the levels in effect for these hospitals on January 1, 2010, or the
 rates in effect on July 1, 2010, to the extent that those rates are lower than the rates in effect on January 1, 2010, as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) The freeze shall remain in effect during the period of time supplemental payments are made under Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1), and thereafter, to the extent that the rates, alone or in combination with any available supplemental payments, are consistent with federal law as provided in this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to develop and implement changes in the methodology for payments for hospital inpatient services, the director shall freeze rates applicable to inpatient hospital services, as specified in this section.

(c) (1) Reimbursement rates for inpatient hospital
 services for all hospitals, except designated public hospitals, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1, that receive Medi-Cal reimbursement from the State Department of Health Care Services, both under contract with the Selective Provider Contracting Program as well as noncontract hospitals, shall be frozen to the lesser of the amount paid on January 1, 2010, or the amount paid on July 1, 2010. The rate freeze shall be in effect for reimbursements for inpatient hospital services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries beginning on July 1, 2010, through and including the date on which the Medicaid Management Information System converts to claim processing based on the new reimbursement methodology developed pursuant to Section 14105.28 and described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of that section.

(2) In the event a contract hospital terminates its contract and becomes a noncontract hospital, the hospital shall receive the same rate or
 rates as provided in paragraph (1) as a contract hospital for inpatient hospital services provided to Medi-Cal eligible individuals while the rate freeze specified in paragraph (1) remains in effect.

(3) This section nullifies any agreement between the state and a hospital for rate adjustments that would be inconsistent with this section. Other provisions of any of those agreements shall be unchanged by this section.

(4) In the event a noncontract hospital elects to become a contract hospital after July 1, 2010, at a negotiated rate or negotiated rates less than the freeze amount provided in paragraph (1), the hospital shall receive the contract rate or rates while the freeze remains in effect.

(d) For purposes of this section, the reimbursement for inpatient hospital services includes the amounts paid for all
 categories of inpatient services allowable by Medi-Cal and shall not include any supplemental payments. The reimbursement includes the amounts paid for routine services together with all related ancillary services.

(e) Within 90 days of the date this section becomes effective, the department shall develop and provide to all hospitals the methodology that will be utilized to implement the rate freeze required by this section for noncontract hospitals.

(f) (1) For dates of service on and after July 1, 2010, the department shall reconcile the payments, as limited by subdivision (c), to the amounts that the hospitals, that are subject to the new methodology set forth in Section 14105.28, would have received if the new methodology had been in effect. The department shall identify the data that will be used in making the reconciliations.

(2) The department shall implement the reconciliation process on the date that the payment methodology based on diagnosis-related groups has been made final, but no later than June 30, 2012. The director shall execute a declaration stating the date on which the new payment methodology has become final.

(3) In the process of reconciliation, no payment, with respect to dates of service prior to the effective date of the act that added this section, shall be reduced below the amount paid pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) Rates paid to hospitals, or for specified services, that are not subject to the methodology in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.28, shall be increased subject to the annual Budget Act.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) or
 any other provision of this section, for the 2011–12 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, or portion thereof, in which subdivision (c) remains in effect, the department shall, subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act applicable to the particular fiscal year, apply an increase in reimbursement rates for all hospital services that result from the freeze imposed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(h) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may take the actions specified in this section by means of provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(i) (1) The rates provided for in this section shall be implemented only if the director determines that the rates, as
 established by this section, will comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.

(2) In assessing whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the rates comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) To the extent that the director determines that the rates do not comply with the federal Medicaid requirements, the director retains the discretion not to implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.

(j) The director shall seek any necessary federal approval for the implementation of this section. To the extent that federal financial participation is
 not available with respect to any rate of reimbursement described by this section, the director retains the discretion not to implement that rate and may revise the rate as necessary to comply with the federal Medicaid requirements.

(k) Subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, shall become inoperative, and any rate that was frozen pursuant to this section shall be restored retroactively to the rate that would have been in effect absent this section, on the effective date of the act that added this subdivision. The department shall explore other avenues that do not involve a rate freeze for achieving the stability needed, including determining base payment rates, in order to transition to an inpatient hospital reimbursement methodology based on diagnosis-related groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 19, Sec. 2.   (SB 90)   Effective April 13, 2011.   Subds. (a) through (g) became inoperative on April 13, 2011, pursuant to subd. (k), which was inserted by Ch. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.29.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (d), additional Medi-Cal payments shall be made to designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities, in recognition of the Medi-Cal managed care share of graduate medical education costs. To the extent permissible under federal law, the department shall make these payments directly to the designated public hospitals and their applicable affiliated government entities.

(2) The graduate medical education payments shall consist of the following components:

(A) Direct graduate medical education payments made in recognition and support of the direct costs incurred in the operation of graduate medical education
 programs, which may include, but are not limited to, salaries, benefits, physician oversight, and allocated overhead costs incurred for interns and residents in medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, podiatry, nursing, and allied health and paramedical programs.

(B) Indirect graduate medical education payments made in recognition and support of the increased operating and patient care costs associated with teaching programs.

(3) Graduate medical education payments shall support, recognize, and enhance the role of designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities in the training of interns, residents, and fellows who are enrolled in accredited medical or dental programs, in advanced practice nursing or other allied health professional programs, or who are pursuing advanced specialty training.

(4) The
 graduate medical education payments shall be inflation adjusted.

(5) The department shall determine the maximum amount of graduate medical education payments and distribute to participating designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities, as applicable, in accordance with a methodology developed in consultation with the designated public hospitals.

(6) Interim graduate medical education payments shall be made on a quarterly basis, and reconciled at the end of the fiscal year to determine the final amounts due based on information reported to the department by the designated public hospitals. To the extent practicable, the department shall seek to minimize the administrative burden on participating designated public hospitals associated with reporting and finalizing graduate medical education payments.

(7) Graduate medical education payments provided pursuant to this section shall not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by the department to Medi-Cal managed care plans or to designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities, or by Medi-Cal managed care plans to designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities. A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not withhold or otherwise reduce other payments to a designated public hospital or its affiliated government entities as a result of implementation of payment programs pursuant to this section.

(b) Subject to subdivision (d), the department may, in consultation with designated public hospitals, seek federal approval to provide for other forms of graduate medical education payments to designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities, including payments that reflect the volume of fee-for-service Medi-Cal services or
 revenue to the extent the fee-for-service payments do not otherwise recognize graduate medical education costs, or incentive payments.

(c) The nonfederal share of payments under this section shall consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by designated public hospitals or their affiliated government entities, or other eligible public entities, including those described in Section 14164, in accordance with this section. No state General Fund moneys shall be used to fund the nonfederal share of payments under this section.

(1) The Designated Public Hospital (DPH) Graduate Medical Education (GME) Special Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited into the DPH GME Special Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for the purposes
 specified in this section. All funds derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the DPH GME Special Fund.

(2) The DPH GME Special Fund shall consist of moneys that a designated public hospital or affiliated government entity, or other public entity, as applicable, elects to transfer to the department for deposit into the fund, to the extent permitted under Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any other applicable federal Medicaid laws. Moneys derived from these intergovernmental transfers in the DPH GME Special Fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of graduate medical education payments authorized under this section, for reimbursing the department’s administrative costs in implementing this section, and to otherwise support the Medi-Cal program. The timing and amounts of the intergovernmental transfers shall be determined by the department in
 consultation with the transferring entities. The department shall determine the intergovernmental transfer amounts for each applicable state fiscal year such that they are sufficient to fund the nonfederal share of the associated graduate medical education payments for that year, plus five percent of the aggregate nonfederal share that would be associated with the graduate medical education payments made pursuant to this section in that applicable state fiscal year as if the federal medical assistance percentage were 50 percent. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to applicable federal Medicaid laws, and in the form and manner as required by the department.

(3) The department shall claim federal financial participation for graduate medical education payments under this section using moneys derived from
 intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this section, and deposited in the DPH GME Special Fund to the full extent permitted by law. In the event federal financial participation is not available with respect to a payment under this section and either is not obtained, or results in a recoupment of payments already made, the department shall return any intergovernmental transfer fund amounts associated with the payment for which federal financial participation is not available to the applicable transferring entities within 14 days from the date of the associated recoupment or other determination, as applicable.

(4) Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all federal and state laws.

(d) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are
 obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) After consultation with the designated public hospitals, the director may modify the requirements set forth in this section to the extent necessary to meet federal requirements for graduate medical education payments for designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities or to maximize federal financial participation available under such a program.

(e) (1) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, through state plan amendments or otherwise, for graduate medical education payments, effective no sooner than January 1, 2017, in accordance with this section.

(2) The department shall consult with the designated
 public hospitals with regard to the development and implementation, and any subsequent modification, of the payment programs established pursuant to this section.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall timely inform, or provide access to, applicable guidance issued pursuant to this authority to affected designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities. This guidance shall remain publicly available until all payments made pursuant to this section are finalized.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Designated public hospitals” means those hospitals identified in subdivision (f) of Section 14184.10.

(2) “Designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities” means those hospitals identified in subdivision (f) of Section 14184.10, and the government entities and agencies with which they are affiliated, inclusive of their affiliated government-operated physician practice groups, affiliated government-operated clinics and other settings that provide clinical training, and affiliated government-operated medical and professional training schools and programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 26.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.291.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (d), additional Medi-Cal payments shall be made to district and municipal hospitals and their affiliated government entities, in recognition of the Medi-Cal managed care share of graduate medical education costs. To the extent permissible under federal law, the department shall make these payments directly to the district and municipal hospitals and their applicable affiliated government entities.

(2) The graduate medical education payments described in paragraph (1) shall be made in a manner consistent with the methodology for graduate medical education payments to designated public hospitals and their affiliated government entities pursuant to Section 14105.29, and shall consist of the
 components described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.29.

(b) Subject to subdivision (d), the department may, in consultation with district and municipal public hospitals, seek federal approval to provide for other forms of graduate medical education payments to district and municipal public hospitals and their affiliated government entities, including payments that reflect the volume of fee-for-service Medi-Cal services or revenue to the extent the fee-for-service payments do not otherwise recognize graduate medical education costs, or incentive payments.

(c) The nonfederal share of payments under this section shall consist of voluntary intergovernmental transfers of funds provided by district and municipal public hospitals or their affiliated government entities, or other eligible public entities, including those described in Section 14164, in accordance with
 this section. No state General Fund moneys shall be used to fund the nonfederal share of payments under this section.

(1) The District and Municipal Public Hospitals (DMPH) Graduate Medical Education (GME) Special Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited into the DMPH GME Special Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the department for the purposes specified in this section. All funds derived pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the DMPH GME Special Fund.

(2) The DMPH GME Special Fund shall consist of moneys that a district and municipal public hospital or affiliated government entity, or other public entity, as applicable, elects to transfer to the department for deposit into the fund, to the extent permitted under
 Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any other applicable federal Medicaid laws. Moneys derived from these intergovernmental transfers in the DMPH GME Special Fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of graduate medical education payments authorized under this section, for reimbursing the department’s administrative costs in implementing this section, and to otherwise support the Medi-Cal program. The timing and amounts of the intergovernmental transfers shall be determined by the department in consultation with the transferring entities. The department shall determine the intergovernmental transfer amounts for each applicable state fiscal year such that they are sufficient to fund the nonfederal share of the associated graduate medical education payments for that year, plus 5 percent of the aggregate nonfederal share that would be associated with the graduate medical education payments made pursuant to this section in that applicable state fiscal year as if the
 federal medical assistance percentage were 50 percent. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to applicable federal Medicaid laws, and in the form and manner as required by the department.

(3) The department shall claim federal financial participation for graduate medical education payments under this section using moneys derived from intergovernmental transfers made pursuant to this section, and deposited into the DMPH GME Special Fund to the full extent permitted by law. If federal financial participation is not available with respect to a payment under this section, and either is not obtained or results in a recoupment of payments already made, the department shall return any intergovernmental transfer fund amounts associated with the payment for which federal financial participation is not available to the
 applicable transferring entities within 14 days from the date of the associated recoupment or other determination, as applicable.

(4) Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all federal and state laws.

(d) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) After consultation with the district and municipal public hospitals, the director may modify the requirements set forth in this section to the extent necessary to meet federal requirements for graduate medical education payments for district and municipal public hospitals and their affiliated government entities or to maximize
 federal financial participation available under such a program.

(e) (1) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, through state plan amendments or otherwise, for graduate medical education payments, effective no sooner than January 1, 2026, in accordance with this section.

(2) The department shall consult with the district and municipal public hospitals with regard to the development and implementation, and any subsequent modification, of the payment programs established pursuant to this section.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters,
 plan letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. The department shall timely inform, or provide access to, applicable guidance issued pursuant to this authority to affected district and municipal hospitals and their affiliated government entities. This guidance shall remain publicly available until all payments made pursuant to this section are finalized.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affiliated government entity” means a government entity or agency with which a district and municipal public hospital is affiliated, inclusive of its affiliated government-operated physician practice groups, affiliated government-operated clinics and other settings that provide clinical training, and affiliated government-operated medical and professional training schools and programs.

(2) “District and municipal public hospital” means a nondesignated public hospital as that term is defined in subdivision (f) of Section 14166.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.3.

(a) The department is considered to be the purchaser, but not the dispenser or distributor, of prescribed drugs under the Medi-Cal program for the purpose of enabling the department to obtain from manufacturers of prescribed drugs the most favorable price for those drugs furnished by one or more manufacturers, based upon the large quantity of the drugs purchased under the Medi-Cal program, and to enable the department, notwithstanding any other provision of state law, to obtain from the manufacturers discounts, rebates, or refunds based on the quantities purchased under the program, insofar as may be permissible under federal law. Nothing in this section shall interfere with usual and customary distribution practices in the drug industry.

(b) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis with manufacturers, distributors, dispensers, or suppliers of appliances, durable medical equipment, medical supplies, and other product-type health care services and with laboratories for clinical laboratory services for the purpose of obtaining the most favorable prices to the state and to assure adequate quality of the product or service. Except as provided in subdivision (f), this subdivision shall not apply to prescribed drugs dispensed by pharmacies licensed pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 4110) of Chapter 9 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department may not enter into a contract with a clinical laboratory unless the clinical laboratory operates in conformity with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200) of
 Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code and the regulations adopted thereunder, and Section 263a of Title 42 of the United States Code and the regulations adopted thereunder.

(d) The department shall contract with manufacturers of single-source drugs on a negotiated basis, and with manufacturers of multisource drugs on a bid or negotiated basis.

(e) In order to ensure and improve access by Medi-Cal beneficiaries to both hearing aid appliances and provider services, and to ensure that the state obtains the most favorable prices, the department, by June 30, 2008, shall enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis, for purchasing hearing aid appliances.

(f) In order to provide specialized care in the distribution of specialized drugs, as identified by the department and that
 include, but are not limited to, blood factors and immunizations, the department may enter into contracts with providers licensed to dispense dangerous drugs or devices pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, for programs that qualify for federal funding pursuant to the Medicaid state plan, or waivers, and the programs authorized by Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of, Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, in accordance with this subdivision.

(1) The department shall, for purposes of ensuring proper patient care, consult current standards of practice when executing a provider contract.

(2) The department shall, for purposes of ensuring quality of care to people with unique conditions requiring specialty
 drugs, contract with a nonexclusive number of providers that meet the needs of the affected population, covers all geographic regions in California, and reflects the distribution of the specialty drug in the community. The department may use a single provider in the event the product manufacturer designates a sole-source delivery mechanism. The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing this section with respect to all of the following:

(A) Notifying stakeholder representatives of the potential inclusion or exclusion of drugs in the specialty pharmacy program.

(B) Allowing for written input regarding the potential inclusion or exclusion of drugs into the specialty pharmacy program.

(C) Scheduling at least one public meeting regarding the potential inclusion or
 exclusion of drugs into the specialty pharmacy program.

(D) Obtaining a recommendation from the Medi-Cal Drug Utilization Review Advisory Committee, established pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8), on the inclusion or exclusion of drugs into the specialty pharmacy program distribution based on clinical best practices related to each drug considered.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the definition of “blood factors” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 14105.86.

(4) The department shall make every reasonable effort to ensure all medically necessary clotting factor therapies are available for the treatment of people with bleeding disorders.

(g) The department may contract with an
 intermediary to establish provider contracts pursuant to this section for programs that qualify for federal funding pursuant to the Medicaid state plan, or waivers, and the programs authorized by Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 125125) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of, Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) In carrying out contracting activity for this or any section associated with the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs, notwithstanding Section 19130 of the Government Code, the department may contract, either directly or through the fiscal intermediary, for pharmacy consultant staff necessary to accomplish the contracting process or treatment authorization request reviews. The fiscal intermediary contract, including any contract amendment, system change pursuant to a change order, and project or systems development notice shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with
 Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and any policies, procedures, or regulations authorized by these provisions.

(i) In order to achieve maximum cost savings, the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this section shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(j) For purposes of implementing the contracting provisions specified in this section, the department shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure adequate access for Medi-Cal patients to quality laboratory testing services in the geographic regions of the state where contracting occurs.

(2) Consult with the
 statewide association of clinical laboratories and other appropriate stakeholders on the implementation of the contracting provisions specified in this section to ensure maximum access for Medi-Cal patients consistent with the savings targets projected by the 2002–03 budget conference committee for clinical laboratory services provided under the Medi-Cal program.

(3) Consider which types of laboratories are appropriate for implementing the contracting provisions specified in this section, including independent laboratories, outreach laboratory programs of hospital-based laboratories, clinic laboratories, physician office laboratories, and group practice laboratories.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 60.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.31.

For purposes of the Medi-Cal contract drug list, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Single-source drug” means a drug that is produced and distributed under an original New Drug Application approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration. This shall include a drug marketed by the innovator manufacturer and any cross-licensed producers or distributors operating under the New Drug Application, and shall also include a biological product, except for vaccines, marketed by the innovator manufacturer and any cross-licensed producers or distributors licensed by the federal Food and Drug Administration pursuant to Section 262 of Title 42 of the United States Code. A drug ceases to be a single-source drug when the same drug in the same dosage form and strength manufactured by
 another manufacturer is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration under the provisions for an Abbreviated New Drug Application.

(b) “Best price” means the negotiated price, or the manufacturer’s lowest price available to any foreign or domestic class of trade organization or entity, including, but not limited to, wholesalers, retailers, hospitals, repackagers, providers, or governmental entities, that contracts with a manufacturer for a specified price for drugs, inclusive of cash discounts, free goods, volume discounts, rebates, and on- or off-invoice discounts or credits, shall be based upon the manufacturer’s commonly used retail package sizes for the drug sold by wholesalers to retail pharmacies.

(c) “Manufacturer” means any person, partnership, corporation, or other institution or entity that is engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of drugs, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, or in the packaging, repackaging, labeling,
 relabeling, and distribution of drugs.

(d) “Price escalator” means a mutually agreed-upon price specified in the contract, to cover anticipated cost increases over the life of the contract.

(e) “Medi-Cal pharmacy costs” or “Medi-Cal drug costs” means all reimbursements to pharmacy providers for services or merchandise, including single-source or multiple-source prescription drugs, over-the-counter medications, and medical supplies, or any other costs billed by pharmacy providers under the Medi-Cal program.

(f) “Medicaid rebate” means the rebate payment made by drug manufacturers pursuant to Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8).

(g) “State rebate” means the amount negotiated between the manufacturer and the department
 for reimbursement by the manufacturer, as specified in the contract, in addition to the Medicaid rebate.

(h) “Date of mailing” means the date that is evidenced by the postmark date by the United States Postal Service or other common mail carrier on the envelope.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall be effective no sooner than January 1, 2021.

(j) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 57.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.33.

(a) The department may enter into contracts with manufacturers of single-source and multiple-source drugs, on a bid or nonbid basis, for drugs from each major therapeutic category, and shall maintain a list of those drugs for which contracts have been executed.

(b) (1) Contracts executed pursuant to this section shall be for the manufacturer’s best price, as defined in Section 14105.31, which shall be specified in the contract, and subject to agreed-upon price escalators, as defined in that section. The contracts shall provide for a state rebate, as defined in Section 14105.31, to be remitted to the department quarterly. The department shall submit an invoice to each manufacturer for the state rebate, including supporting utilization